District of Columbia statutes.
5-1417

Regulations and fees.

(a)

The Mayor shall promulgate proposed regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed regulations shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the regulations, in whole or in part, by resolution within the 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

(b)

The Mayor is authorized to establish fees and rates required by this chapter.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2918, 47 DCR 6308
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to Title XXIX of D.C. Law 13-172, the “Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Act of 2000” Creating the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner, see Mayor’s Order 2001-04, January 5, 2001 ( 48 DCR 938).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2918 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
This section is referenced in § 5-1412.